District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.10

Notice, delivery, acceptance, consideration not required.

A transfer on death deed is effective without:

(1)

Notice or delivery to or acceptance by the designated beneficiary during the transferor’s life; or

(2)

Consideration.

History

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606